Washington statutes.
RCW 5.40.010

Pleadings do not constitute proof.

Pleadings sworn to by either party in any case shall not, on the trial, be deemed proof of the facts alleged therein, nor require other or greater proof on the part of the adverse party.

[Code 1881 s 741; 1877 p 151 s 746; 1854 p 219 s 484; RRS s 283.]